test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONG_manidoo_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imanidooishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imanidooishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imanidooishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imanidooishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imanidooishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imanidooishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imanidooishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imanidooishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imanidooishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imanidooishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imanidooishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmanidoo+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imanidooishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: manidooensimishinaaniban
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: manidooensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: manidooensimishiwaaiban
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: manidooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: manidooensimishiniiban
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: manidooensimishini***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: manidooenhimishinaaniban
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: manidooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: manidooenhimishiwaaiban
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: manidooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: manidooenhimishiniiban
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: manidooenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: manidooensimishinaanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: manidooensimishinaanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: manidooensimishinaaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: manidooensimishiwaaan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: manidooensimishiwaaag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: manidooensimishiwaaing
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: manidooensimishinian
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: manidooensimishiniag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: manidooensimishiniing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: manidooenhimishinaanan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: manidooenhimishinaanag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: manidooenhimishinaaning
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: manidooenhimishiwaaan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: manidooenhimishiwaaag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: manidooenhimishiwaaing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: manidooenhimishinian
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: manidooenhimishiniag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: manidooenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: manidooensimishibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: manidooensimishibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: manidooensimishibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: manidooensimish***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: manidooensimish***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: manidooensimish***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: manidooenhimishibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: manidooenhimishibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: manidooenhimishibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhimish***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooensiminaanibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooensiminaanibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooensiminaanibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooensimiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooensimiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooensimiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooensiminiibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooensiminiibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooensiminiibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooensimini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooensimini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooensimini***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooenhiminaanibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooenhiminaanibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooenhiminaanibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooenhimiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooenhimiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooenhimiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooenhiminiibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooenhiminiibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooenhiminiibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhimini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooensishinaanibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooensishinaanibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooensishinaanibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooensishiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooensishiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooensishiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooensishiniibanan
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooensishiniibanag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooensishiniibaning
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooensishini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooensishini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooensishini***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooenhishinaanibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooenhishinaanibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooenhishinaanibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooenhishiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooenhishiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooenhishiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooenhishiniibanan
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooenhishiniibanag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooenhishiniibaning
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooenhishini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: manidooimishinaanibanan
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: manidooimishinaanibanag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: manidooimishinaanibaning
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: manidooimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: manidooimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: manidooimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: manidooimishiwaaibanan
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: manidooimishiwaaibanag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: manidooimishiwaaibaning
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: manidooimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: manidooimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: manidooimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: manidooimishiniibanan
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: manidooimishiniibanag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: manidooimishiniibaning
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: manidooimishini***idig, idog***an
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: manidooimishini***idig, idog***ag
     manidoo+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: manidooimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimanidooensimishinaaniban
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimanidooensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimanidooensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimanidooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimanidooensimishiniiban
     +Px1manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimanidooensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimanidooenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimanidooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimanidooenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimanidooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimanidooenhimishiniiban
     +Px1manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimanidooenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimanidooensimishinaaniban
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimanidooensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimanidooensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimanidooensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimanidooensimishiniiban
     +Px2manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimanidooensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimanidooenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimanidooenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimanidooenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimanidooenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimanidooenhimishiniiban
     +Px2manidoo+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimanidooenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omanidooensimishinaaniban
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omanidooensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3manidoo+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omanidooensimishiwaaiban
